dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ab Y 6
SFX Ab 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ab 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Ab 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Ab 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Ab 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Ab 0 е/xPxE .

SFX Ac Y 11
SFX Ac 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ac 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Ac 0 и/xPxE .
SFX Ac 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Ac 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX Ac 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Ac 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Ac 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Ac 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Ac 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX Ac к че/xPxE .

SFX Ad Y 10
SFX Ad 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ad 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX Ad 0 е/xPxE .
SFX Ad 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Ad 0 ев/xPxE .
SFX Ad 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Ad 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Ad 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Ad 0 ем/xPxE .
SFX Ad 0 ами/xPxE .

SFX Ae Y 53
SFX Ae єти л .
SFX Ae єти ла .
SFX Ae єти ло .
SFX Ae єти ли .
SFX Ae єти у .
SFX Ae єти ем .
SFX Ae єти еш .
SFX Ae єти е .
SFX Ae єти емо .
SFX Ae єти ете .
SFX Ae єти ут .
SFX Ae ти х .
SFX Ae ти ше .
SFX Ae ти хмо .
SFX Ae ти сте .
SFX Ae ти ху .
SFX Ae єти и .
SFX Ae єти имо .
SFX Ae єти ите .
SFX Ae єти учи .
SFX Ae єти учего .
SFX Ae єти учему .
SFX Ae єти учим .
SFX Ae єти учем .
SFX Ae єти учих .
SFX Ae єти учими .
SFX Ae єти уча .
SFX Ae єти учу .
SFX Ae єти учеј .
SFX Ae єти учеју .
SFX Ae єти уче .
SFX Ae єти емы .
SFX Ae єти емого .
SFX Ae єти емому .
SFX Ae єти емым .
SFX Ae єти емом .
SFX Ae єти емо .
SFX Ae єти ема .
SFX Ae єти ему .
SFX Ae єти емој .
SFX Ae єти емоју .
SFX Ae єти еми .
SFX Ae єти еме .
SFX Ae єти емых .
SFX Ae єти емым .
SFX Ae єти емыми .
SFX Ae єти ши .
SFX Ae єти ша .
SFX Ae єти ше .
SFX Ae єти ты .
SFX Ae єти та .
SFX Ae єти то .
SFX Ae єти тје .

SFX Af Y 9
SFX Af 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Af о о/xPxBxO .
SFX Af о а/xPxE .
SFX Af но ен/xPxE .
SFX Af о у/xPxE .
SFX Af о ах/xPxE .
SFX Af о ам/xPxE .
SFX Af 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Af о ами/xPxE .

SFX Ag Y 2
SFX Ag 0 и .
SFX Ag 0 ју .

SFX Ah Y 11
SFX Ah 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ah а о/xPxBxO .
SFX Ah а ы/xPxE .
SFX Ah а у/xPxE .
SFX Ah ка ек/xPxE .
SFX Ah а є/xPxE .
SFX Ah 0 х/xPxE .
SFX Ah 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Ah а оју/xPxE .
SFX Ah 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX Ah а о/xPxE .

SFX Ai Y 11
SFX Ai 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ai 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX Ai ец ци/xPxE .
SFX Ai ец ца/xPxE .
SFX Ai ец цев/xPxE .
SFX Ai ец цу/xPxE .
SFX Ai ец цах/xPxE .
SFX Ai ец цам/xPxE .
SFX Ai ец цем/xPxE .
SFX Ai ец цами/xPxE .
SFX Ai ец че/xPxE .

SFX Aj Y 68
SFX Aj ти л .
SFX Aj ти ла .
SFX Aj ти ло .
SFX Aj ти ли .
SFX Aj стити шчу .
SFX Aj ти м .
SFX Aj ти ш .
SFX Aj ти 0 .
SFX Aj ти мо .
SFX Aj и е .
SFX Aj ити ет .
SFX Aj ти х .
SFX Aj ти ше .
SFX Aj ти хмо .
SFX Aj ти сте .
SFX Aj ти ху .
SFX Aj ити ечи .
SFX Aj ити еча .
SFX Aj ити ече .
SFX Aj ти мы .
SFX Aj ти мого .
SFX Aj ти мому .
SFX Aj ти мым .
SFX Aj ти мом .
SFX Aj ти мо .
SFX Aj ти ма .
SFX Aj ти му .
SFX Aj ти мој .
SFX Aj ти моју .
SFX Aj ти ми .
SFX Aj ти ме .
SFX Aj ти мых .
SFX Aj ти мым .
SFX Aj ти мыми .
SFX Aj ти вши .
SFX Aj ти вшего .
SFX Aj ти вшему .
SFX Aj ти вшим .
SFX Aj ти вшем .
SFX Aj ти вших .
SFX Aj ти вшими .
SFX Aj ти вша .
SFX Aj ти вшу .
SFX Aj ти вшеј .
SFX Aj ти вшеју .
SFX Aj ти вше .
SFX Aj стити шчены .
SFX Aj стити шченого .
SFX Aj стити шченому .
SFX Aj стити шченым .
SFX Aj стити шченом .
SFX Aj стити шчени .
SFX Aj стити шчене .
SFX Aj стити шченых .
SFX Aj стити шчеными .
SFX Aj стити шчена .
SFX Aj стити шчену .
SFX Aj стити шченој .
SFX Aj стити шченоју .
SFX Aj стити шчено .
SFX Aj стити шченје/xPxE .
SFX Aj стити шченја/xPxE .
SFX Aj стити шченју/xPxE .
SFX Aj стити шченјем/xPxE .
SFX Aj стити шчениј/xPxE .
SFX Aj стити шченјам/xPxE .
SFX Aj стити шченјами/xPxE .
SFX Aj стити шченјах/xPxE .

SFX Ak Y 7
SFX Ak 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ak а о/xPxBxO .
SFX Ak а у/xPxE .
SFX Ak а ы/xPxE .
SFX Ak а є/xPxE .
SFX Ak а оју/xPxE .
SFX Ak а о/xPxE .

SFX Al Y 4
SFX Al ого то .
SFX Al го м .
SFX Al го му .
SFX Al ого ым .

SFX Am Y 6
SFX Am 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Am 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Am 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Am 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Am 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Am к че/xPxE .

SFX An Y 5
SFX An 0 0/xPxE .
SFX An е е/xPxBxO .
SFX An е а/xPxE .
SFX An е у/xPxE .
SFX An 0 м/xPxE .

SFX Ao Y 8
SFX Ao 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ao 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Ao 0 и/xPxE .
SFX Ao 0 иј/xPxE .
SFX Ao 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Ao 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Ao 0 ју/xPxE .
SFX Ao 0 ами/xPxE .

SFX Ap Y 8
SFX Ap 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ap о а/xPxE .
SFX Ap о 0 .
SFX Ap о у/xPxE .
SFX Ap о ах/xPxE .
SFX Ap о ам/xPxE .
SFX Ap 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Ap о ами/xPxE .

SFX Aq Y 68
SFX Aq ти л .
SFX Aq ти ла .
SFX Aq ти ло .
SFX Aq ти ли .
SFX Aq сити шу .
SFX Aq ти м .
SFX Aq ти ш .
SFX Aq ти 0 .
SFX Aq ти мо .
SFX Aq и е .
SFX Aq ити ет .
SFX Aq ти х .
SFX Aq ти ше .
SFX Aq ти хмо .
SFX Aq ти сте .
SFX Aq ти ху .
SFX Aq ити ечи .
SFX Aq ити еча .
SFX Aq ити ече .
SFX Aq ти мы .
SFX Aq ти мого .
SFX Aq ти мому .
SFX Aq ти мым .
SFX Aq ти мом .
SFX Aq ти мо .
SFX Aq ти ма .
SFX Aq ти му .
SFX Aq ти мој .
SFX Aq ти моју .
SFX Aq ти ми .
SFX Aq ти ме .
SFX Aq ти мых .
SFX Aq ти мым .
SFX Aq ти мыми .
SFX Aq ти вши .
SFX Aq ти вшего .
SFX Aq ти вшему .
SFX Aq ти вшим .
SFX Aq ти вшем .
SFX Aq ти вших .
SFX Aq ти вшими .
SFX Aq ти вша .
SFX Aq ти вшу .
SFX Aq ти вшеј .
SFX Aq ти вшеју .
SFX Aq ти вше .
SFX Aq сити шены .
SFX Aq сити шеного .
SFX Aq сити шеному .
SFX Aq сити шеным .
SFX Aq сити шеном .
SFX Aq сити шени .
SFX Aq сити шене .
SFX Aq сити шеных .
SFX Aq сити шеными .
SFX Aq сити шена .
SFX Aq сити шену .
SFX Aq сити шеној .
SFX Aq сити шеноју .
SFX Aq сити шено .
SFX Aq сити шенје/xPxE .
SFX Aq сити шенја/xPxE .
SFX Aq сити шенју/xPxE .
SFX Aq сити шенјем/xPxE .
SFX Aq сити шениј/xPxE .
SFX Aq сити шенјам/xPxE .
SFX Aq сити шенјами/xPxE .
SFX Aq сити шенјах/xPxE .

SFX Ar Y 81
SFX Ar ојдти шел .
SFX Ar ојдти шла .
SFX Ar ојдти шло .
SFX Ar ојдти шли .
SFX Ar ти у .
SFX Ar ти ем .
SFX Ar ти еш .
SFX Ar ти е .
SFX Ar ти емо .
SFX Ar ти ете .
SFX Ar ти ут .
SFX Ar ти ех .
SFX Ar ти еше .
SFX Ar ти ехмо .
SFX Ar ти есте .
SFX Ar ти еху .
SFX Ar ти и .
SFX Ar ти имо .
SFX Ar ти ите .
SFX Ar ти учи .
SFX Ar ти учего .
SFX Ar ти учему .
SFX Ar ти учим .
SFX Ar ти учем .
SFX Ar ти учих .
SFX Ar ти учими .
SFX Ar ти уча .
SFX Ar ти учу .
SFX Ar ти учеј .
SFX Ar ти учеју .
SFX Ar ти уче .
SFX Ar ти омы .
SFX Ar ти омого .
SFX Ar ти омому .
SFX Ar ти омым .
SFX Ar ти омом .
SFX Ar ти омо .
SFX Ar ти ома .
SFX Ar ти ому .
SFX Ar ти омој .
SFX Ar ти омоју .
SFX Ar ти оми .
SFX Ar ти оме .
SFX Ar ти омых .
SFX Ar ти омым .
SFX Ar ти омыми .
SFX Ar ти омо .
SFX Ar ојдти шевши .
SFX Ar ојдти шевшего .
SFX Ar ојдти шевшему .
SFX Ar ојдти шевшим .
SFX Ar ојдти шевшем .
SFX Ar ојдти шевших .
SFX Ar ојдти шевшими .
SFX Ar ојдти шевша .
SFX Ar ојдти шевшу .
SFX Ar ојдти шевшеј .
SFX Ar ојдти шевшеју .
SFX Ar ојдти шевше .
SFX Ar ти ены .
SFX Ar ти еного .
SFX Ar ти еному .
SFX Ar ти еным .
SFX Ar ти еном .
SFX Ar ти ени .
SFX Ar ти ене .
SFX Ar ти еных .
SFX Ar ти еными .
SFX Ar ти ена .
SFX Ar ти ену .
SFX Ar ти еној .
SFX Ar ти еноју .
SFX Ar ти ено .
SFX Ar ти енје/xPxE .
SFX Ar ти енја/xPxE .
SFX Ar ти енју/xPxE .
SFX Ar ти енјем/xPxE .
SFX Ar ти ениј/xPxE .
SFX Ar ти енјам/xPxE .
SFX Ar ти енјами/xPxE .
SFX Ar ти енјах/xPxE .

SFX As Y 9
SFX As 0 0/xPxE .
SFX As о о/xPxBxO .
SFX As о а/xPxE .
SFX As о 0 .
SFX As о у/xPxE .
SFX As о ах/xPxE .
SFX As о ам/xPxE .
SFX As 0 м/xPxE .
SFX As о ами/xPxE .

SFX At Y 12
SFX At небуд енебуд .
SFX At небуд анебуд .
SFX At небуд егонебуд .
SFX At небуд унебуд .
SFX At небуд ејнебуд .
SFX At небуд емнебуд .
SFX At небуд емунебуд .
SFX At небуд имнебуд .
SFX At небуд ејунебуд .
SFX At небуд инебуд .
SFX At небуд ихнебуд .
SFX At небуд иминебуд .

SFX Au Y 11
SFX Au 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Au 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX Au 0 и/xPxE .
SFX Au 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Au 0 ев/xPxE .
SFX Au 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Au 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Au 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Au 0 ем/xPxE .
SFX Au 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX Au ц че/xPxE .

SFX Av Y 8
SFX Av 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Av 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX Av 0 и/xPxE .
SFX Av 0 иј/xPxE .
SFX Av 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Av 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Av 0 ју/xPxE .
SFX Av 0 ами/xPxE .
